District of Columbia statutes.
42-410

Map or plat of subdivisions not recordable.

It shall not be lawful for any person or persons to record any map or plat of the subdivision of land in the District of Columbia in the office of the Recorder of Deeds for said District, whether such map or plat be attached to a deed or other document or is offered separately for record.

Aug. 24, 1894, 28 Stat. 501, ch. 329

History

Recordation of maps and plats in surveyor’s office, see § 1-1305 et seq.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 45-806.
1973 Ed., § 45-506.

Prior Codifications